Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.091

Compliance reports—Preliminary and final.

(1) No later than nine months after the final performance audit has been transmitted by the joint committee to the appropriate standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee in consultation with the standing committees may produce a preliminary compliance report on the agency's or local government's compliance with the final performance audit recommendations. The agency or local government may attach its comments to the joint committee's preliminary compliance report as a separate addendum.

(2) Within three months after the issuance of the preliminary compliance report, the joint committee may hold at least one public hearing and receive public testimony regarding the findings and recommendations contained in the preliminary compliance report. The joint committee may waive the public hearing requirement if the preliminary compliance report demonstrates that the agency or local government is in compliance with the audit recommendations. The joint committee shall issue any final compliance report within four weeks after the public hearing or hearings. The legislative auditor shall transmit the final compliance report in the same manner as a final performance audit is transmitted under RCW 44.28.088.

[ 1996 c 288 s 14.]